Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated  to the Department of Public Safety Standards and
Training, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$9,795,963 for debt service.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses  from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training, for the following purposes:
(1) Operations................................. $ 44,005,650
(2) Public Safety Memorial Fund ... $ 269,438
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$7,543,497 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds  collected or received by the Department of Public
Safety Standards and Training.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5034 (HB 5034-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5034 (HB 5034-A) Page 2